Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-427.01
Representative peer review organization, defined.

Representative peer review organization means a utilization and quality control peer review organization as defined in section 1152 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1320c-1, as such section existed on September 1, 2007.

Laws 2007, LB203, § 3.